Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 2. Survival of Causes

§ 1451.
What actions survive.

Actions of ejectment or other proper actions to recover the seisin or possession of lands, tenements, or hereditaments, actions of replevin, actions on tort on account of the wrongful conversion of personal estate, and actions on tort on account of a trespass or for damages done to real or personal estate shall survive, in addition to the actions that survive by common law, and may be commenced and prosecuted by the executor or administrator.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1452.
When actions for personal injury survive.

In an action for the recovery of damages for a bodily hurt or injury, occasioned to the plaintiff by the act or default of the defendant or defendants, if either party dies during the pendency of the action, the action shall survive and may be prosecuted to final judgment by or against the executors or administrators of the deceased party. When there are several defendants in the action, and one or more, but not all, die, it shall be prosecuted against the surviving defendant or defendants, and against the estate of the deceased defendant or defendants.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 9, 1978;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1453.
Survival of causes of action.

The causes of action mentioned in sections 1451 and 1452 of this title shall survive. Actions based thereon may be commenced and prosecuted by or against the executor or administrator. When the actions are commenced in the lifetime of the deceased, after death the same may be prosecuted by or against the executor or administrator where by law that mode of prosecution is authorized.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 69;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1454.
Trespass; damages.

In an action on tort on account of a trespass commenced or prosecuted against an executor or administrator, the plaintiff or claimant shall recover for the value of the goods taken, or the actual damage, and not vindictive or exemplary damages.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 70;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 1455.
Heir may not sue until share assigned.

When an executor or administrator is appointed and assumes the trust, an action of ejectment, or other action to recover the seisin or possession of lands, or for damage done to the lands, shall not be maintained by an heir or devisee until there is a decree of the Probate Division of the Superior Court assigning the lands to the heir or devisee, or the time allowed for paying debts has expired, unless the executor or administrator surrenders the possession to the heir or devisee.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.